Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.916

Rule-making authority—2020 c 227.

The department is granted rule-making authority to adopt rules necessary for the implementation of chapter 227, Laws of 2020.

[ 2020 c 227 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 227: See note following RCW 26.09.320.